Wisconsin, session 2025, AB946.
do enact as follows:AB946,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB946,28Section 2. 20.255 (1) (et) of the statutes is created to read:AB946,2,11920.255 (1) (et) Behavioral health prevention pilot program. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule to implement the pilot program under 112025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 4 (1).AB946,312Section 3. 20.255 (1) (et) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 13(this act), is repealed.AB946,414Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB946,2,1515(1) Behavioral health prevention pilot program.AB946,2,1716(a) Definition. In this subsection, “mental health professional” has the 17meaning given for “competent mental health professional” in s. 49.45 (30j) (a) 1.AB946,2,2418(b) Pilot program. In the 2026-27 and 2027-28 school years, the department of 19public instruction shall implement a pilot program to give at least 50,000 pupils 20enrolled in or attending a high school in this state access to an electronic 21multicomponent behavioral health prevention tool provided by an entity that has 22demonstrated experience providing the tool to pupils in public schools serving rural 23and urban areas in other states. The department may expend not more than 24$1,500,000 in a school year to implement this subsection.AB946,3,31(c) Cooperative educational service agency. The department of public 2instruction may contract with a cooperative educational service agency to 3administer the pilot program under par. (b).AB946,3,54(d) Tool requirements. The electronic multicomponent behavioral health 5prevention tool under par. (b) shall meet all of the following requirements:AB946,3,661. Provide at least all of the following services:AB946,3,77a. Access to online behavioral health education resources.AB946,3,98b. Peer-to-peer support services, including a premoderated online peer chat 9space.AB946,3,1010c. Online private sessions with a mental health professional.AB946,3,11112. Be based upon a population health model.AB946,3,13123. Be accessible as both a native mobile application and a web-based 13application with equitable access across multiple types of devices.AB946,3,15144. Offer full English- and Spanish-language functionality and interpreter 15services to support additional languages.AB946,3,18165. Allow users to review mental health professional profiles and exercise 17choice in selecting a mental health professional from whom to receive services 18through the electronic multicomponent behavioral health prevention tool.AB946,519Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 20publication, except as follows:AB946,3,2221(1) Behavioral health prevention pilot program; repeal. The repeal of s. 2220.255 (1) (et) takes effect on July 1, 2028.AB946,3,2323